Utah statutes.
57-10-5.   Descriptions of tracts extending over more than one zone.
(1)  When any tract of land that is to be defined by a single land description
extends from one into another of the coordinate zones, the positions of all
points on its boundaries may be referred to by either of the two zones.
(2)  The zone that is used shall be identified specifically in the land
description.
